Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 10, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Hutchinson; Civil Air Patrol 3,700,000 For a grant to the city of Hutchinson to predesign, design, new text begin construct, new text end equip, and furnish a hangar and statewide training center for the Civil Air Patrol. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end